Indiana, session 2026, SB244.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 4-33-2-17, AS AMENDED BY P.L.293-2019,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 17. "Riverboat" means any of the following on
which lawful gambling is authorized under this article:
(1) A self-propelled excursion boat that complies with
IC 4-33-6-6(a) and is located in a county that is contiguous to
Lake Michigan or the Ohio River.
(2) A casino located in a historic hotel district.
(3) A permanently moored craft operating from a county
described in subdivision (1).
(4) An inland casino operating under IC 4-33-6-24.
(5) A casino operated in Gary under IC 4-33-6-4.5.
(6) A casino operated in Vigo County under IC 4-33-6.7.
(7) A casino operated in Marion County under IC 4-33-6-26.
SECTION 2. IC 4-33-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.293-2019,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The commission may issue to a person a
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


license to own a riverboat subject to the numerical and geographical
limitation of owner's licenses under this section and IC 4-33-4-17. Not
more than ten (10) owner's licenses may be in effect at any time.
Subject to subsection (d), those owner's licenses may be issued as
follows:
(1) Not more than two (2) licenses for not more than two (2)
riverboats that operate in or from the city of Gary.
(2) One (1) license for a riverboat that operates from the city of
Hammond.
(3) One (1) license for a riverboat that operates from the city of
East Chicago.
(4) One (1) license for a city located in a county contiguous to
Lake Michigan. However, this license may not be issued to a city
described in subdivisions (1) through (3).
(5) Not more than a total of five (5) licenses for riverboats that
operate upon the Ohio River from the following counties:
(A) Vanderburgh County.
(B) Harrison County.
(C) Switzerland County.
(D) Ohio County.
(E) Dearborn County.
The commission may not issue a license to an applicant if the
issuance of the license would result in more than one (1) riverboat
operating from a county described in this subdivision.
(6) Not more than one (1) license for a riverboat that operates as
an inland casino in Vigo County under IC 4-33-6.7.
(7) Not more than one (1) license for a riverboat that operates
as a casino in Marion County under section 26 of this chapter.
(b) In addition to its power to issue owner's licenses under
subsection (a), the commission may also enter into a contract under
IC 4-33-6.5 with respect to the operation of one (1) riverboat on behalf
of the commission in a historic hotel district.
(c) Except as provided in section 26 of this chapter, a person
holding an owner's license may not move the person's riverboat from
the county in which the riverboat was docked on January 1, 2007, to
any other county.
(d) The following apply to the allocation and issuance of owner's
licenses under subsection (a):
(1) A licensed owner holding two licenses issued under
subsection (a)(1) must relinquish one (1) of the licenses under
section 4.5 of this chapter upon the commission's approval of the
licensed owner's request to relocate gaming operations under
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


section 4.5 of this chapter.
(2) An owner's license relinquished under subdivision (1) and
section 4.5 of this chapter may not be reissued with respect to
gaming operations in Gary.
(3) The licensed owner who relinquishes a license under
subdivision (1) and section 4.5 of this chapter may operate two
(2) docked riverboats under a single license unless and until the
licensed owner begins gaming operations at a relocated inland
casino under section 4.5 of this chapter.
(4) If an owner's license is relinquished under subdivision (1) and
section 4.5 of this chapter, an owner's license may be issued to
authorize gaming operations in Vigo County in accordance with
subsection (a)(6) and the procedures set forth in IC 4-33-6.7.
(5) If the commission approves a licensed owner's request to
relocate gaming operations from Ohio County under section
26 of this chapter, the following apply:
(A) The licensed owner may be authorized to begin gaming
operations in a casino in Marion County in accordance
with subsection (a)(7) and the procedures set forth in
section 26 of this chapter.
(B) A new owner's license may not be issued to authorize
gaming operations in Ohio County after gaming operations
are relocated to Marion County.
SECTION 3. IC 4-33-6-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.293-2019,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c) or (d),
a riverboat that operates in a county that is contiguous to Lake
Michigan or the Ohio River must:
(1) have either:
(A) a valid certificate of inspection from the United States
Coast Guard for the carrying of at least five hundred (500)
passengers; or
(B) a valid certificate of compliance with marine structural and
life safety standards determined by the commission; and
(2) be at least one hundred fifty (150) feet in length.
(b) This subsection applies only to a riverboat that operates on the
Ohio River. A riverboat must replicate, as nearly as possible, historic
Indiana steamboat passenger vessels of the nineteenth century.
However, steam propulsion or overnight lodging facilities are not
required under this subsection.
(c) A riverboat described in IC 4-33-2-17(3) must have a valid
certificate of compliance with the marine structural and life safety
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


standards determined by the commission under IC 4-33-4-13.5 for a
permanently moored craft.
(d) A riverboat constructed under section 24 of this chapter or a
riverboat relocated under section 4.5 or 26 of this chapter must comply
with all applicable building codes and any safety requirements imposed
by the commission.
SECTION 4. IC 4-33-6-24, AS AMENDED BY P.L.293-2019,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) This section does not apply to:
(1) gaming operations relocated under section 4.5 or 26 of this
chapter; or
(2) an inland casino operated in Vigo County under IC 4-33-6.7.
(b) For purposes of this section, property is considered to be
adjacent to a riverboat dock site even if it is separated from the dock
site by public rights-of-way or railroad rights-of-way.
(c) A licensed owner may relocate the licensed owner's gaming
operation from a docked riverboat to an inland casino if the following
conditions are met:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (d), the casino is located on
property that the licensed owner owned or leased and used in the
conduct of the licensed owner's gaming operations on February 1,
2015.
(2) The casino is located on property adjacent to the dock site of
the licensed owner's riverboat.
(3) The casino complies with all applicable building codes and
any safety requirements imposed by the commission.
(4) The commission approves the relocation of the licensed
owner's gaming operation.
(d) This subsection applies to a licensed owner that owns or leases
property that is considered adjacent to a riverboat dock site under
subsection (b). The licensed owner may:
(1) acquire part of the public rights-of-way or railroad
rights-of-way to form a contiguous parcel with the property
owned or leased by the licensed owner on February 1, 2015; and
(2) subject to the other requirements of this section, situate an
inland casino on the contiguous parcel formed under subdivision
(1).
(e) The commission may impose any requirement upon a licensed
owner relocating gaming operations under this section.
(f) The number of gambling games offered by a licensed owner in
an inland facility operated under this section may not exceed the
greatest number of gambling games offered by the licensed owner in
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


the licensed owner's docked riverboat since January 1, 2007.
SECTION 5. IC 4-33-6-26 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 26. (a) A person holding an owner's license for a
riverboat operated from Ohio County may move gaming
operations to a casino in Marion County only if the:
(1) licensed owner submits to the commission:
(A) a request for approval to relocate the licensed owner's
gaming operations; and
(B) the evidence of support from the city of Rising Sun and
the city of Indianapolis prescribed by section 26.5 of this
chapter;
(2) licensed owner plans an investment of at least seven
hundred fifty million dollars ($750,000,000) for the
development of a casino and nongaming amenities onsite in
Marion County in accordance with subsection (d);
(3) licensed owner affirms that the licensed owner will work
with the city of Rising Sun, Ohio County, and the Indiana
economic development corporation to redevelop the vacated
site of gaming operations in Ohio County in a manner that
best serves the interests of the local community;
(4) licensed owner complies with all applicable building codes
and any safety requirements imposed by the commission;
(5) licensed owner complies with any other requirement
imposed by the commission; and
(6) commission approves the request.
(b) The commission shall prescribe the form of the request for
approval to relocate the licensed owner's gaming operations under
this section.
(c) Before approving a request to relocate the licensed owner's
gaming operations under this section, the commission shall
consider the following:
(1) The impact of the relocation on other casinos in
southeastern Indiana, including the estimated increased
gaming revenue for the casinos located in Dearborn County
and Switzerland County and the increased state tax revenue
received from those casinos.
(2) The estimated economic benefits.
(3) The estimated tax revenue.
(4) The estimated number of new jobs.
(5) An expected timeline for the relocation and development
of a casino and nongaming amenities, including the initial
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


phase of development and the completion of development.
(6) Any other issue deemed appropriate by the commission.
(d) The licensed owner's planned investment in the relocated
gaming operations must be made as follows:
(1) At least sixty percent (60%) must be invested in the initial
phase of development.
(2) The remaining amount must be invested, and the
relocation and development of the casino and nongaming
amenities completed, not later than five (5) years after gaming
operations begin at the casino approved under this section.
(e) If the licensed owner sells or otherwise transfers the licensed
owner's interest in the owner's license within ten (10) years from
the date the relocation of gaming operations is approved by the
commission under this section, the following apply:
(1) The licensed owner shall pay a fee of fifty million dollars
($50,000,000) before the sale or transfer of the license may be
approved by the commission. Any payment required under
this subsection shall be deposited in the state general fund.
(2) If, at the time of the transfer of ownership, the seven
hundred fifty million dollar ($750,000,000) investment
required under subsection (a)(2) has not been met, the person
acquiring the owner's license shall, not later than ten (10)
years from the date the relocation of gaming operations is
approved by the commission under this section, invest in the
casino and nongaming amenities an amount that is at least
equal to the difference between seven hundred fifty million
dollars ($750,000,000) and the amount actually invested by
the person transferring the owner's license.
SECTION 6. IC 4-33-6-26.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 26.5. (a) If the licensed owner described in section 26
of this chapter submits a proposal to relocate to a facility located
in Marion County, the licensed owner must submit to the
commission a letter of support for the proposed relocation signed
by the mayor of the city of Rising Sun. The mayor's support under
this subsection is in addition to the support required under
subsection (b).
(b) If the licensed owner described in section 26 of this chapter
submits a proposal to relocate to a facility located within Marion
County, the licensed owner must submit to the commission a letter
of support for the proposed relocation signed by the mayor of the
city of Indianapolis. The mayor's support under this subsection is
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


in addition to the support required under subsection (a).
SECTION 7. IC 4-33-6-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) If the commission approves a licensed owner's
request to relocate gaming operations under section 26 of this
chapter, the licensed owner shall pay to the commission a
relocation fee in the amount of twenty-five million dollars
($25,000,000). The fee imposed by this section is payable in two (2)
installments as follows:
(1) Twelve million five hundred thousand dollars
($12,500,000) due not later than one hundred eighty (180)
days after the day that the commission approves the licensed
owner's request.
(2) Twelve million five hundred thousand dollars
($12,500,000) due not later than one hundred eighty (180)
days after the day that the licensed owner commences gaming
operations at the new facility approved under section 26 of
this chapter.
(b) The commission shall transfer fees received under this
section to the state comptroller for deposit in the state general
fund.
SECTION 8. IC 4-33-6-28 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 28. (a) Before the October 1 that falls after the end of
the first state fiscal year in which gaming operations begin in a
casino in Marion County that is relocated under IC 4-33-6-26, and
before October 1 of each year thereafter, the licensed owner shall
pay a community support fee to the city of Rising Sun and Ohio
County according to the following:
(1) The licensed owner shall pay to the fiscal officer of the city
of Rising Sun an amount equal to the total amount of tax
revenue received by the city of Rising Sun under IC 4-33-12
and IC 4-33-13 during the last full state fiscal year in which
gaming operations are conducted in a riverboat located in
Ohio County.
(2) The licensed owner shall pay to the fiscal officer of Ohio
County an amount equal to the total amount of tax revenue
received by Ohio County under IC 4-33-12 and IC 4-33-13
during the last full state fiscal year in which gaming
operations are conducted in a riverboat located in Ohio
County.
(b) Before the first October 1 that falls after the end of the first
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


state fiscal year in which gaming operations begin in a casino in
Marion County, the state comptroller shall compute the amounts
described in subsection (a)(1) and (a)(2) and notify the licensed
owner of the casino in Marion County.
(c) Money distributed to the city of Rising Sun or Ohio County
under subsection (a):
(1) may not be used to reduce the unit's maximum levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5 but may be used at the discretion of the unit to
reduce the property tax levy of the unit for a particular year;
(2) may be used for any legal or corporate purpose of the unit,
including the pledge of money to bonds, leases, or other
obligations under IC 5-1-14-4; and
(3) is considered miscellaneous revenue.
SECTION 9. IC 4-33-12-1.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.293-2019,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. (a) A supplemental wagering tax on the
wagering occurring each day at a riverboat is imposed upon the
licensed owner operating the riverboat.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d), subsections (d) and (e),
and subject to subsection (c), the amount of supplemental wagering tax
imposed for a particular day is determined by multiplying the
riverboat's adjusted gross receipts for that day by the quotient of:
(1) the total riverboat admissions tax that the riverboat's licensed
owner paid beginning July 1, 2016, and ending June 30, 2017;
divided by
(2) the riverboat's adjusted gross receipts beginning July 1, 2016,
and ending June 30, 2017.
(c) The quotient used under subsection (b) to determine the
supplemental wagering tax liability of a licensed owner subject to
subsection (b) may not exceed the following when expressed as a
percentage:
(1) Four percent (4%) before July 1, 2019.
(2) Three and five-tenths percent (3.5%) after June 30, 2019.
(d) The supplemental wagering tax liability of a licensed owner
operating an inland casino in Vigo County is equal to two and
nine-tenths percent (2.9%) of the riverboat's adjusted gross receipts for
the day.
(e) The supplemental wagering tax liability of a licensed owner
operating a casino in Marion County is equal to three and
five-tenths percent (3.5%) of the riverboat's adjusted gross
receipts for the day.
SECTION 10. IC 4-33-12-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.104-2022,
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The department shall place in the state
general fund the tax revenue collected under this chapter.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) and by sections 8, and 8.5,
and 10 of this chapter, the treasurer of state shall quarterly pay the
following amounts:
(1) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, thirty-three
and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the admissions tax and
supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner during
the quarter shall be paid to:
(A) the city in which the riverboat is located, if the city:
(i) is located in a county having a population of more than
one hundred twelve thousand (112,000) and less than one
hundred twenty thousand (120,000); or
(ii) is contiguous to the Ohio River and is the largest city in
the county; and
(B) the county in which the riverboat is located, if the
riverboat is not located in a city described in clause (A).
(2) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, thirty-three
and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the admissions tax and
supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner during
the quarter shall be paid to the county in which the riverboat is
located. In the case of a county described in subdivision (1)(B),
this thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) of the admissions
tax and supplemental wagering tax is in addition to the
thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) received under
subdivision (1)(B).
(3) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three and
thirty-three hundredths percent (3.33%) of the admissions tax and
supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner during
the quarter shall be paid to the county convention and visitors
bureau or promotion fund for the county in which the riverboat is
located.
(4) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, five percent
(5%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner during a quarter shall be paid to
the state fair commission, for use in any activity that the
commission is authorized to carry out under IC 15-13-3.
(5) Except as provided in section 9(k) of this chapter, three and
thirty-three hundredths percent (3.33%) of the admissions tax and
supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner during
the quarter shall be paid to the division of mental health and
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


addiction. The division shall allocate at least twenty-five percent
(25%) of the funds derived from the admissions tax to the
prevention and treatment of compulsive gambling.
(6) Twenty-one and six hundred sixty-seven thousandths percent
(21.667%) of the admissions tax and supplemental wagering tax
collected by the licensed owner during the quarter shall be paid
to the state general fund.
(c) If the commission approves the licensed owner's request for
a riverboat operated from Ohio County to move gaming operations
to Marion County under IC 4-33-6-26, the following apply:
(1) An entity that receives distributions under this section
attributable to the riverboat in Ohio County is not entitled to
receive a distribution under this section after the distribution
of supplemental wagering tax collected by the licensed owner
during the last calendar quarter in which gaming operations
are conducted at the riverboat in Ohio County.
(2) A city, county, or county convention and visitors bureau or
promotion fund that receives distributions under this section
attributable to the riverboat in Ohio County is not entitled to
receive a supplemental distribution under IC 4-33-13-5(f).
SECTION 11. IC 4-33-12-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.144-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) This section applies only to tax revenue
distributed under section 6 or 8 of this chapter. Except as provided in
subsections (g) through (j), money paid to a unit of local government
under section 6 or 8 of this chapter:
(1) must be paid to the fiscal officer of the unit and may be
deposited in the unit's general fund or riverboat fund established
under IC 36-1-8-9, or both;
(2) may not be used to reduce the unit's maximum levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5 but may be used at the discretion of the unit to
reduce the property tax levy of the unit for a particular year;
(3) may be used for any legal or corporate purpose of the unit,
including the pledge of money to bonds, leases, or other
obligations under IC 5-1-14-4; and
(4) is considered miscellaneous revenue.
(b) Money paid by the treasurer of state to a county convention and
visitors bureau or promotion fund under section 6 of this chapter must
be:
(1) deposited in:
(A) the county convention and visitor promotion fund; or
(B) the county's general fund if the county does not have a
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


convention and visitor promotion fund; and
(2) used only for the tourism promotion, advertising, and
economic development activities of the county and community.
(c) Money received by the division of mental health and addiction
under section 6 or 8 of this chapter:
(1) is annually appropriated to the division of mental health and
addiction;
(2) shall be distributed to the division of mental health and
addiction at times during each state fiscal year determined by the
budget agency; and
(3) shall be used by the division of mental health and addiction
for programs and facilities for the prevention and treatment of
addictions to drugs, alcohol, and compulsive gambling, including
the creation and maintenance of a toll free telephone line to
provide the public with information about these addictions.
The division shall allocate at least twenty-five percent (25%) of the
money received to the prevention and treatment of compulsive
gambling.
(d) This subsection applies to the following entities receiving money
under section 6 or 8 of this chapter:
(1) A city or county.
(2) A county convention and visitors bureau or promotion fund
for a county other than Lake County.
(3) The state fair commission.
(4) The division of mental health and addiction.
The treasurer of state shall determine the total amount of money paid
by the treasurer of state to an entity subject to this subsection during
the state fiscal year 2002. The amount determined under this subsection
is the base year revenue for each entity subject to this subsection. The
treasurer of state shall certify the base year revenue determined under
this subsection to each entity subject to this subsection. However,
after a riverboat operated in Ohio County moves gaming
operations to a casino in Marion County under IC 4-33-6-26, the
treasurer of state may not include amounts received by the state
fair commission or the division of mental health and addiction
during the state fiscal year 2002 from the riverboat operated in
Ohio County when making the base year revenue determinations
for the state fair commission or the division of mental health.
(e) This subsection applies to the following entities receiving money
under section 8 of this chapter:
(1) A county convention and visitors bureau for Lake County.
(2) The northern Indiana law enforcement training center.
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


The treasurer of state shall determine the total amount of money paid
by the treasurer of state to the entity described in subdivision (1) during
state fiscal year 2002. The amount determined under this subsection
multiplied by nine-tenths (0.9) is the base year revenue for the entity
described in subdivision (1). The amount determined under this
subsection multiplied by one-tenth (0.1) is the base year revenue for the
entity described in subdivision (2). The treasurer of state shall certify
the base year revenue determined under this subsection to each entity
subject to this subsection.
(f) The total amount of money distributed to an entity under section
6 or 8 of this chapter during a state fiscal year may not exceed the
entity's base year revenue as determined under subsection (d) or (e).
For purposes of this section, the treasurer of state shall treat any
amounts distributed under section 8 of this chapter to the northwest
Indiana regional development authority as amounts constructively
received by East Chicago, Gary, Hammond, and Lake County, as
appropriate. If the treasurer of state determines that the total amount of
money:
(1) distributed to an entity; and
(2) constructively received by an entity;
under section 6 or 8 of this chapter during a state fiscal year is less than
the entity's base year revenue, the treasurer of state shall make a
supplemental distribution to the entity under IC 4-33-13-5.
(g) The Dearborn County council may vote to direct the county
auditor of Dearborn County to make distributions as described in
subsection (h).
(h) If a majority of the Dearborn County council vote to direct the
county auditor of Dearborn County to make distributions under this
subsection, the county auditor of Dearborn County shall distribute
twenty-five percent (25%) of money received under section 6 of this
chapter to cities and towns in Dearborn County that have not received
money under section 6 of this chapter, as of January 1, 2017, and where
a riverboat is not located:
(1) proportionately using a ratio of the population that each city
and town bears to the total population of all cities and towns in
Dearborn County where a riverboat is not located; and
(2) to the fiscal officer of the city or town.
(i) A city or town that receives money as described in subsection
(h):
(1) may not use the money to reduce the city's or town's maximum
levy under IC 6-1.1-18.5;
(2) may use the money to reduce the property tax levy of the city
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


or town for a specific year; and
(3) may use the money for any legal or corporate purpose of the
city or town, including the pledge of money to bonds, leases, or
other obligations under IC 5-1-14-4.
(j) Money distributed under subsection (h) is considered
miscellaneous revenue.
(k) The treasurer of state shall pay that part of the riverboat
admissions taxes that:
(1) exceeds a particular entity's base year revenue; and
(2) would otherwise be due to the entity under this section;
to the state general fund instead of to the entity.
SECTION 12. IC 4-33-12-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) This section applies only
to tax revenue collected from a casino located in Marion County.
(b) The treasurer of state shall pay the following amounts from
taxes collected during the preceding calendar quarter from the
casino located in Marion County:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) shall be distributed to Marion County.
(2) Fifty percent (50%) shall be deposited in the state general
fund.
(c) Money paid under subsection (b)(1) is considered
miscellaneous revenue and:
(1) must be paid to the fiscal officer of the unit and may be
deposited in the unit's general fund or a riverboat fund
established by the county under IC 36-1-8-9, or both;
(2) may not be used to reduce the unit's maximum levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5 but may be used at the discretion of the unit to
reduce the property tax levy of the unit for a particular year;
and
(3) may be used for the construction, reconstruction, and
preservation of the consolidated city's local streets (as defined
in IC 8-14-2-1(9)). However, the money may not be used for:
(A) reducing the capacity of existing roads and streets;
(B) greenways;
(C) bike lanes;
(D) bike trails; or
(E) sidewalks.
SECTION 13. IC 4-33-13-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 109, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) This subsection does not
apply to tax revenue remitted by an operating agent operating a
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


riverboat in a historic hotel district. Excluding funds that are
appropriated in the biennial budget act from the state gaming fund to
the commission for purposes of administering this article, each month
the state comptroller shall distribute the tax revenue deposited in the
state gaming fund under this chapter to the following:
(1) An amount equal to the following shall be set aside for
revenue sharing under subsection (d):
(A) Before July 1, 2021, the first thirty-three million dollars
($33,000,000) of tax revenues collected under this chapter
shall be set aside for revenue sharing under subsection (d).
(B) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under
this article during the preceding state fiscal year is equal to or
greater than the total adjusted gross receipts received by
licensees from gambling games authorized under this article
during the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, the first
thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) of tax revenues
collected under this chapter shall be set aside for revenue
sharing under subsection (d).
(C) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under
this article during the preceding state fiscal year is less than
the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees from
gambling games authorized under this article during the state
year ending June 30, 2020, an amount equal to the first
thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) of tax revenues
collected under this chapter multiplied by the result of:
(i) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the preceding state fiscal year; divided by
(ii) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2020;
shall be set aside for revenue sharing under subsection (d).
(2) Subject to subsection (c), twenty-five percent (25%) of the
remaining tax revenue remitted by each licensed owner shall be
paid:
(A) to the city in which the riverboat is located or that is
designated as the home dock of the riverboat from which the
tax revenue was collected, in the case of:
(i) a city described in IC 4-33-12-6(b)(1)(A);
(ii) a city located in Lake County or Marion County; or
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


(iii) Terre Haute; or
(B) to the county that is designated as the home dock of the
riverboat from which the tax revenue was collected, in the case
of a riverboat that is not located in a city described in clause
(A) or whose home dock is not in a city described in clause
(A).
(3) The remainder of the tax revenue remitted by each licensed
owner shall be paid to the state general fund. In each state fiscal
year, the state comptroller shall make the transfer required by this
subdivision on or before the fifteenth day of the month based on
revenue received during the preceding month for deposit in the
state gaming fund. Specifically, the state comptroller may transfer
the tax revenue received by the state in a month to the state
general fund in the immediately following month according to this
subdivision.
(b) This subsection applies only to tax revenue remitted by an
operating agent operating a riverboat in a historic hotel district after
June 30, 2019. Excluding funds that are appropriated in the biennial
budget act from the state gaming fund to the commission for purposes
of administering this article, each month the state comptroller shall
distribute the tax revenue remitted by the operating agent under this
chapter as follows:
(1) For state fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2019, but
ending before July 1, 2021, fifty-six and five-tenths percent
(56.5%) shall be paid to the state general fund.
(2) For state fiscal years beginning after June 30, 2021, fifty-six
and five-tenths percent (56.5%) shall be paid as follows:
(A) Sixty-six and four-tenths percent (66.4%) shall be paid to
the state general fund.
(B) Thirty-three and six-tenths percent (33.6%) shall be paid
to the West Baden Springs historic hotel preservation and
maintenance fund established by IC 36-7-11.5-11(b).
However, if:
(i) at any time the balance in that fund exceeds twenty-five
million dollars ($25,000,000); or
(ii) in any part of a state fiscal year in which the operating
agent has received at least one hundred million dollars
($100,000,000) of adjusted gross receipts;
the amount described in this clause shall be paid to the state
general fund for the remainder of the state fiscal year.
(3) Forty-three and five-tenths percent (43.5%) shall be paid as
follows:
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


(A) Twenty-two and four-tenths percent (22.4%) shall be paid
as follows:
(i) Fifty percent (50%) to the fiscal officer of the town of
French Lick.
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) to the fiscal officer of the town of
West Baden Springs.
(B) Fourteen and eight-tenths percent (14.8%) shall be paid to
the county treasurer of Orange County for distribution among
the school corporations in the county. The governing bodies
for the school corporations in the county shall provide a
formula for the distribution of the money received under this
clause among the school corporations by joint resolution
adopted by the governing body of each of the school
corporations in the county. Money received by a school
corporation under this clause must be used to improve the
educational attainment of students enrolled in the school
corporation receiving the money. Not later than the first
regular meeting in the school year of a governing body of a
school corporation receiving a distribution under this clause,
the superintendent of the school corporation shall submit to
the governing body a report describing the purposes for which
the receipts under this clause were used and the improvements
in educational attainment realized through the use of the
money. The report is a public record.
(C) Thirteen and one-tenth percent (13.1%) shall be paid to the
county treasurer of Orange County.
(D) Five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) shall be distributed
quarterly to the county treasurer of Dubois County for
appropriation by the county fiscal body after receiving a
recommendation from the county executive. The county fiscal
body for the receiving county shall provide for the distribution
of the money received under this clause to one (1) or more
taxing units (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-21) in the county under
a formula established by the county fiscal body after receiving
a recommendation from the county executive.
(E) Five and three-tenths percent (5.3%) shall be distributed
quarterly to the county treasurer of Crawford County for
appropriation by the county fiscal body after receiving a
recommendation from the county executive. The county fiscal
body for the receiving county shall provide for the distribution
of the money received under this clause to one (1) or more
taxing units (as defined in IC 6-1.1-1-21) in the county under
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


a formula established by the county fiscal body after receiving
a recommendation from the county executive.
(F) Six and thirty-five hundredths percent (6.35%) shall be
paid to the fiscal officer of the town of Paoli.
(G) Six and thirty-five hundredths percent (6.35%) shall be
paid to the fiscal officer of the town of Orleans.
(H) Twenty-six and four-tenths percent (26.4%) shall be paid
to the Indiana economic development corporation established
by IC 5-28-3-1 for transfer as follows:
(i) Beginning after December 31, 2017, ten percent (10%)
of the amount transferred under this clause in each calendar
year shall be transferred to the South Central Indiana
Regional Economic Development Corporation or a
successor entity or partnership for economic development
for the purpose of recruiting new business to Orange County
as well as promoting the retention and expansion of existing
businesses in Orange County.
(ii) The remainder of the amount transferred under this
clause in each calendar year shall be transferred to Radius
Indiana or a successor regional entity or partnership for the
development and implementation of a regional economic
development strategy to assist the residents of Orange
County and the counties contiguous to Orange County in
improving their quality of life and to help promote
successful and sustainable communities.
To the extent possible, the Indiana economic development
corporation shall provide for the transfer under item (i) to be
made in four (4) equal installments. However, an amount
sufficient to meet current obligations to retire or refinance
indebtedness or leases for which tax revenues under this
section were pledged before January 1, 2015, by the Orange
County development commission shall be paid to the Orange
County development commission before making distributions
to the South Central Indiana Regional Economic Development
Corporation and Radius Indiana or their successor entities or
partnerships. The amount paid to the Orange County
development commission shall proportionally reduce the
amount payable to the South Central Indiana Regional
Economic Development Corporation and Radius Indiana or
their successor entities or partnerships.
(c) This subsection does not apply to tax revenue remitted by an
inland casino operating in Vigo County or a casino operating in
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


Marion County. For each city and county receiving money under
subsection (a)(2), the state comptroller shall determine the total amount
of money paid by the state comptroller to the city or county during the
state fiscal year 2002. The amount determined is the base year revenue
for the city or county. The state comptroller shall certify the base year
revenue determined under this subsection to the city or county. The
total amount of money distributed to a city or county under this section
during a state fiscal year may not exceed the entity's base year revenue.
For each state fiscal year, the state comptroller shall pay that part of the
riverboat wagering taxes that:
(1) exceeds a particular city's or county's base year revenue; and
(2) would otherwise be due to the city or county under this
section;
to the state general fund instead of to the city or county.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (k) and (l), before August 15
of each year, the state comptroller shall distribute the wagering taxes
set aside for revenue sharing under subsection (a)(1) to the county
treasurer of each county that does not have a riverboat according to the
ratio that the county's population bears to the total population of the
counties that do not have a riverboat. Except as provided in subsection
(g), the county auditor shall distribute the money received by the
county under this subsection as follows:
(1) To each city located in the county according to the ratio the
city's population bears to the total population of the county.
(2) To each town located in the county according to the ratio the
town's population bears to the total population of the county.
(3) After the distributions required in subdivisions (1) and (2) are
made, the remainder shall be retained by the county.
(e) Money received by a city, town, or county under subsection (d)
or (g) may be used for any of the following purposes:
(1) To reduce the property tax levy of the city, town, or county for
a particular year (a property tax reduction under this subdivision
does not reduce the maximum levy of the city, town, or county
under IC 6-1.1-18.5).
(2) For deposit in a special fund or allocation fund created under
IC 8-22-3.5, IC 36-7-14, IC 36-7-14.5, IC 36-7-15.1, and
IC 36-7-30 to provide funding for debt repayment.
(3) To fund sewer and water projects, including storm water
management projects.
(4) For police and fire pensions.
(5) To carry out any governmental purpose for which the money
is appropriated by the fiscal body of the city, town, or county.
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


Money used under this subdivision does not reduce the property
tax levy of the city, town, or county for a particular year or reduce
the maximum levy of the city, town, or county under
IC 6-1.1-18.5.
(f) This subsection does not apply to an inland casino operating in
Vigo County or a casino operating in Marion County. Subject to
IC 4-33-12-6(c), before July 15 of each year, the state comptroller shall
determine the total amount of money distributed to an entity under
IC 4-33-12-6 or IC 4-33-12-8 during the preceding state fiscal year. If
the state comptroller determines that the total amount of money
distributed to an entity under IC 4-33-12-6 or IC 4-33-12-8 during the
preceding state fiscal year was less than the entity's base year revenue
(as determined under IC 4-33-12-9), the state comptroller shall make
a supplemental distribution to the entity from taxes collected under this
chapter and deposited into the state general fund. Except as provided
in subsection (h), the amount of an entity's supplemental distribution
is equal to:
(1) the entity's base year revenue (as determined under
IC 4-33-12-9); minus
(2) the sum of:
(A) the total amount of money distributed to the entity and
constructively received by the entity during the preceding state
fiscal year under IC 4-33-12-6 or IC 4-33-12-8; plus
(B) the amount of any admissions taxes deducted under
IC 6-3.1-20-7.
(g) This subsection applies only to Marion County. The county
auditor shall distribute the money received by the county under
subsection (d) as follows:
(1) To each city, other than the consolidated city, located in the
county according to the ratio that the city's population bears to the
total population of the county.
(2) To each town located in the county according to the ratio that
the town's population bears to the total population of the county.
(3) After the distributions required in subdivisions (1) and (2) are
made, the remainder shall be paid in equal amounts to the
consolidated city and the county.
(h) This subsection does not apply to an inland casino operating in
Vigo County or a casino operating in Marion County. This
subsection applies to a supplemental distribution made after June 30,
2017. The maximum amount of money that may be distributed under
subsection (f) in a state fiscal year is equal to the following:
(1) Before July 1, 2021, forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


(2) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under this
article during the preceding state fiscal year is equal to or greater
than the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees from
gambling games authorized under this article during the state
fiscal year ending June 30, 2020, the maximum amount is
forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).
(3) After June 30, 2021, if the total adjusted gross receipts
received by licensees from gambling games authorized under this
article during the preceding state fiscal year is less than the total
adjusted gross receipts received by licensees from gambling
games authorized under this article during the state fiscal year
ending June 30, 2020, the maximum amount is equal to the result
of:
(A) forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000); multiplied by
(B) the result of:
(i) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the preceding state fiscal year; divided by
(ii) the total adjusted gross receipts received by licensees
from gambling games authorized under this article during
the state fiscal year ending June 30, 2020.
If the total amount determined under subsection (f) exceeds the
maximum amount determined under this subsection, the amount
distributed to an entity under subsection (f) must be reduced according
to the ratio that the amount distributed to the entity under IC 4-33-12-6
or IC 4-33-12-8 bears to the total amount distributed under
IC 4-33-12-6 and IC 4-33-12-8 to all entities receiving a supplemental
distribution.
(i) This subsection applies to a supplemental distribution, if any,
payable to Lake County, Hammond, Gary, or East Chicago under
subsections (f) and (h). Beginning in July 2016, the state comptroller
shall, after making any deductions from the supplemental distribution
required by IC 6-3.1-20-7, deduct from the remainder of the
supplemental distribution otherwise payable to the unit under this
section the lesser of:
(1) the remaining amount of the supplemental distribution; or
(2) the difference, if any, between:
(A) three million five hundred thousand dollars ($3,500,000);
minus
(B) the amount of admissions taxes constructively received by
the unit in the previous state fiscal year.
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125


The state comptroller shall distribute the amounts deducted under this
subsection to the northwest Indiana redevelopment authority
established under IC 36-7.5-2-1 for deposit in the development
authority revenue fund established under IC 36-7.5-4-1.
(j) Money distributed to a political subdivision under subsection (b):
(1) must be paid to the fiscal officer of the political subdivision
and may be deposited in the political subdivision's general fund
(in the case of a school corporation, the school corporation may
deposit the money into either the education fund (IC 20-40-2) or
the operations fund (IC 20-40-18)) or riverboat fund established
under IC 36-1-8-9, or both;
(2) may not be used to reduce the maximum levy under
IC 6-1.1-18.5 of a county, city, or town or the maximum tax rate
of a school corporation, but, except as provided in subsection
(b)(3)(B), may be used at the discretion of the political
subdivision to reduce the property tax levy of the county, city, or
town for a particular year;
(3) except as provided in subsection (b)(3)(B), may be used for
any legal or corporate purpose of the political subdivision,
including the pledge of money to bonds, leases, or other
obligations under IC 5-1-14-4; and
(4) is considered miscellaneous revenue.
Money distributed under subsection (b)(3)(B) must be used for the
purposes specified in subsection (b)(3)(B).
(k) After June 30, 2020, the amount of wagering taxes that would
otherwise be distributed to South Bend under subsection (d) shall be
deposited as being received from all riverboats whose supplemental
wagering tax, as calculated under IC 4-33-12-1.5(b), is over three and
five-tenths percent (3.5%). The amount deposited under this
subsection, in each riverboat's account, is proportionate to the
supplemental wagering tax received from that riverboat under
IC 4-33-12-1.5 in the month of July. The amount deposited under this
subsection must be distributed in the same manner as the supplemental
wagering tax collected under IC 4-33-12-1.5. This subsection expires
June 30, 2021.
(l) After June 30, 2021, the amount of wagering taxes that would
otherwise be distributed to South Bend under subsection (d) shall be
withheld and deposited in the state general fund.
2026 IN 244—LS 6720/DI 125